Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WASTEWATER INDUSTRIAL PRETREATMENT FACILITY.new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the First District Association, a dairy cooperative located in the city of Litchfield to design, engineer, construct, equip, and furnish a new wastewater industrial pretreatment facility in the city of Litchfield. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 15, subdivision 7, and is for the same purpose. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end